District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.06

Indemnity.

An insurer shall not be liable for the following:

(1)

Damages or restitution provided by this subchapter, either jointly, severably, or as a third party, for insurance fraud offense committed by an insured; or

(2)

The defense of an insured or other person who is charged with insurance fraud.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125f
as added Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-273, § 2, 46 DCR 1132

History

1981 Ed., § 22-3825.6.

Prior Codifications